Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.70.060

Elevators, moving walks.

All conveyances owned or operated by code cities as defined by the provisions of chapter 70.87 RCW, shall be subject to the provisions of that chapter to the extent specifically provided for therein.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.70.060.]